Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,121
Hospital medical staff committee; hospital utilization committee; extended care facility utilization committee; recommendations or orders; liability for damages.

No hospital medical staff committee or hospital utilization committee or extended care facility utilization committee or any member or agent of any such committee shall be held legally liable for damages or other relief to any patient or to any person or organization in behalf of any patient because of any recommendation or order made by such committee with reference to the hospitalization or continued hospitalization or confinement in an extended care facility of any individual or patient.

Laws 1967, c. 142, § 2, p. 438.